Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3710
Motor club; security; purpose.

The security required in section 44-3709 shall be used for the following:

(1) Protection, use, and benefit of all persons whose applications for membership in a motor club have been accepted by such club or its representative; and

(2) Covering of the following obligations, which are hereby required to be met:

(a) The faithful furnishing and rendering to members by the club of any and all of the motor club services furnished, sold, or offered for sale by it;

(b) The complying with and abiding by all the provisions of sections 44-3701 to 44-3721 by the club, and all the rules and regulations of the director, adopted and promulgated in accordance with sections 44-3701 to 44-3721; and

(c) The paying of all fines and penalties by the club that may become due to the state from the club under and by virtue of the provisions of sections 44-3701 to 44-3721.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 10.